tools/nvda/louis/tables/lo-g1.utb
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB4\x0EC8 13-2456-146-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB4\x0EC9 13-2456-146-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB4\x0ECA 13-2456-146-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB4\x0ECB 13-2456-146-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB4 136-2456-146-1
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB4\x0EC8 136-2456-146-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB4\x0EC9 136-2456-146-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB4\x0ECA 136-2456-146-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB4\x0ECB 136-2456-146-1-236
# er vowels
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB5 1245-146
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB5\x0EC8 1245-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB5\x0EC9 1245-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB5\x0ECA 1245-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB5\x0ECB 1245-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB5 13-146
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB5\x0EC8 13-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB5\x0EC9 13-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB5\x0ECA 13-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB5\x0ECB 13-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB5 136-146
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB5\x0EC8 136-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB5\x0EC9 136-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB5\x0ECA 136-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB5\x0ECB 136-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB5 12456-146
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB5\x0EC8 12456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB5\x0EC9 12456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB5\x0ECA 12456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB5\x0ECB 12456-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB5 245-146
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB5\x0EC8 245-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB5\x0EC9 245-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB5\x0ECA 245-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB5\x0ECB 245-146-236	
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB5 234-146
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB5\x0EC8 234-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB5\x0EC9 234-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB5\x0ECA 234-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB5\x0ECB 234-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB5 2346-146
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB5\x0EC8 2346-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB5\x0EC9 2346-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB5\x0ECA 2346-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB5\x0ECB 2346-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB5 13456-146
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB5\x0EC8 13456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB5\x0EC9 13456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB5\x0ECA 13456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB5\x0ECB 13456-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB5 145-146
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB5\x0EC8 145-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB5\x0EC9 145-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB5\x0ECA 145-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB5\x0ECB 145-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB5 1256-146
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB5\x0EC8 1256-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB5\x0EC9 1256-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB5\x0ECA 1256-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB5\x0ECB 1256-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EB5 2345-146
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EB5\x0EC8 2345-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EB5\x0EC9 2345-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EB5\x0ECA 2345-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EB5\x0ECB 2345-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EB5 23456-146
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EB5\x0EC8 23456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EB5\x0EC9 23456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EB5\x0ECA 23456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EB5\x0ECB 23456-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EB5 1345-146
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EB5\x0EC8 1345-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EB5\x0EC9 1345-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EB5\x0ECA 1345-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EB5\x0ECB 1345-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EB5 1236-146
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EB5\x0EC8 1236-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EB5\x0EC9 1236-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EB5\x0ECA 1236-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EB5\x0ECB 1236-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EB5 12346-146
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EB5\x0EC8 12346-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EB5\x0EC9 12346-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EB5\x0ECA 12346-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EB5\x0ECB 12346-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EB5 1234-146
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EB5\x0EC8 1234-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EB5\x0EC9 1234-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EB5\x0ECA 1234-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EB5\x0ECB 1234-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EB5 1346-146
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EB5\x0EC8 1346-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EB5\x0EC9 1346-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EB5\x0ECA 1346-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EB5\x0ECB 1346-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EB5 1456-146
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EB5\x0EC8 1456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EB5\x0EC9 1456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EB5\x0ECA 1456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EB5\x0ECB 1456-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EB5 1246-146
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EB5\x0EC8 1246-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EB5\x0EC9 1246-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EB5\x0ECA 1246-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EB5\x0ECB 1246-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EB5 134-146
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EB5\x0EC8 134-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EB5\x0EC9 134-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EB5\x0ECA 134-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EB5\x0ECB 134-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EB5 6-13456-146
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EB5\x0EC8 6-13456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EB5\x0EC9 6-13456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EB5\x0ECA 6-13456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EB5\x0ECB 6-13456-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EB5 123-146
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EB5\x0EC8 123-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EB5\x0EC9 123-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EB5\x0ECA 123-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EB5\x0ECB 123-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EB5 1235-146
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EB5\x0EC8 1235-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EB5\x0EC9 1235-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EB5\x0ECA 1235-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EB5\x0ECB 1235-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EB5 2456-146
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0EC8 2456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0EC9 2456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0ECA 2456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0ECB 2456-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB5 125-146
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB5\x0EC8 125-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB5\x0EC9 125-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB5\x0ECA 125-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB5\x0ECB 125-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB5 135-146
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB5\x0EC8 135-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB5\x0EC9 135-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB5\x0ECA 135-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB5\x0ECB 135-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB5 123456-146
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB5\x0EC8 123456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB5\x0EC9 123456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB5\x0ECA 123456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB5\x0ECB 123456-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB5 6-1345-146
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB5\x0EC8 6-1345-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB5\x0EC9 6-1345-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB5\x0ECA 6-1345-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB5\x0ECB 6-1345-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB5 6-134-146
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB5\x0EC8 6-134-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB5\x0EC9 6-134-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB5\x0ECA 6-134-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB5\x0ECB 6-134-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB5 125-3-146
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB5\x0EC8 125-3-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB5\x0EC9 125-3-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB5\x0ECA 125-3-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB5\x0ECB 125-3-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EB5 125-12456-146
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EB5\x0EC8 125-12456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EB5\x0EC9 125-12456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EB5\x0ECA 125-12456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EB5\x0ECB 125-12456-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EB5 125-13456-146
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EB5\x0EC8 125-13456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EB5\x0EC9 125-13456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EB5\x0ECA 125-13456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EB5\x0ECB 125-13456-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EB5 125-1345-146
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EB5\x0EC8 125-1345-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EB5\x0EC9 125-1345-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EB5\x0ECA 125-1345-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EB5\x0ECB 125-1345-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EB5 125-123-146
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EB5\x0EC8 125-123-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EB5\x0EC9 125-123-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EB5\x0ECA 125-123-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EB5\x0ECB 125-123-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EB5 125-2456-146
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0EC8 125-2456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0EC9 125-2456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0ECA 125-2456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0ECB 125-2456-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EB5 125-134-146
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EB5\x0EC8 125-134-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EB5\x0EC9 125-134-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EB5\x0ECA 125-134-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EB5\x0ECB 125-134-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EB5 1245-2456-146
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0EC8 1245-2456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0EC9 1245-2456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0ECA 1245-2456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0ECB 1245-2456-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB5 13-2456-146
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0EC8 13-2456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0EC9 13-2456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0ECA 13-2456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0ECB 13-2456-146-236
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB5 136-2456-146
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0EC8 136-2456-146-35
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0EC9 136-2456-146-256
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0ECA 136-2456-146-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB5\x0ECB 136-2456-146-236
# short ear vowels
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB1\x0E8D 1245-12356-1
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB1\x0EC8\x0E8D 1245-12356-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB1\x0EC9\x0E8D 1245-12356-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB1\x0ECA\x0E8D 1245-12356-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB1\x0ECB\x0E8D 1245-12356-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB1\x0E8D 13-12356-1
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB1\x0EC8\x0E8D 13-12356-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB1\x0EC9\x0E8D 13-12356-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB1\x0ECA\x0E8D 13-12356-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB1\x0ECB\x0E8D 13-12356-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB1\x0E8D 136-12356-1
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB1\x0EC8\x0E8D 136-12356-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB1\x0EC9\x0E8D 136-12356-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB1\x0ECA\x0E8D 136-12356-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB1\x0ECB\x0E8D 136-12356-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB1\x0E8D 12456-12356-1
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB1\x0EC8\x0E8D 12456-12356-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB1\x0EC9\x0E8D 12456-12356-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB1\x0ECA\x0E8D 12456-12356-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB1\x0ECB\x0E8D 12456-12356-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB1\x0E8D 245-12356-1
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB1\x0EC8\x0E8D 245-12356-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB1\x0EC9\x0E8D 245-12356-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB1\x0ECA\x0E8D 245-12356-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB1\x0ECB\x0E8D 245-12356-1-236	
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB1\x0E8D 234-12356-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB1\x0EC8\x0E8D 234-12356-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB1\x0EC9\x0E8D 234-12356-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB1\x0ECA\x0E8D 234-12356-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB1\x0ECB\x0E8D 234-12356-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB1\x0E8D 2346-12356-1
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB1\x0EC8\x0E8D 2346-12356-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB1\x0EC9\x0E8D 2346-12356-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB1\x0ECA\x0E8D 2346-12356-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB1\x0ECB\x0E8D 2346-12356-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB1\x0E8D 13456-12356-1
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB1\x0EC8\x0E8D 13456-12356-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB1\x0EC9\x0E8D 13456-12356-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB1\x0ECA\x0E8D 13456-12356-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB1\x0ECB\x0E8D 13456-12356-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB1\x0E8D 145-12356-1
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB1\x0EC8\x0E8D 145-12356-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB1\x0EC9\x0E8D 145-12356-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB1\x0ECA\x0E8D 145-12356-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB1\x0ECB\x0E8D 145-12356-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB1\x0E8D 1256-12356-1
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB1\x0EC8\x0E8D 1256-12356-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB1\x0EC9\x0E8D 1256-12356-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB1\x0ECA\x0E8D 1256-12356-1-2356
